Massachusetts, session 194th, H2662.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 20O of chapter 233 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 2020 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “firefighter” the following words:- “, 
police dispatcher or 911 operator”.